Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.04.070

Future voter.

"Future voter" means a United States citizen and Washington state resident, age sixteen or seventeen, who has provided information related to voter registration to the appropriate state agencies.

[ 2023 c 361 s 2; 2018 c 109 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2018 c 109: See notes following RCW 29A.08.170.